lexc/noun/enhuho.lexc
LEXICON Casemelyko
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounmely
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fammely;

LEXICON AddNoun1mely
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1mely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1mely;

LEXICON Poss1mely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA12§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez13§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE14§m   Fam1mely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE14§d   Fam1mely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam1mely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam1mely;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE14§t§OEOE3§k   Fam1mely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam1mely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   Fam1mely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   Fam1mely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   Fam1mely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   Fam1mely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1mely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   Fam1mely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Possmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fammely;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;
LEXICON Plur1mely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez15§k    Gen1mely;
! has no esc, required
                    
LEXICON Plurmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely;
        
LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;
LEXICON Fam1mely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1mely;
                       Gen1mely;

LEXICON Gen1mely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1mely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1mely;               
                       Case1mely;

LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely;
 
LEXICON Case1mely
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
Beregújfalu AddNounmely;
Beregújfalu:Beregújfalv AddNoun1mely;
Boldogkőújfalu AddNounmely;
Csanakfalu AddNounmely;
Csanakfalu:Csanakfalv AddNoun1mely;
Csákyújfalu AddNounmely;
Erie-tó:Erie-tav AddNoun1mely;
Felfalu AddNounmely;
Gyergyóújfalu AddNounmely;
Győrújfalu:Győrújfalv AddNoun1mely;
Görögfalu AddNounmely;
Homoródújfalu AddNounmely;
Hosszúfalu:Hosszúfalv AddNoun1mely;
Ipolynagyfalu AddNounmely;
Kisfalu:Kisfalv AddNoun1mely;
Kistótfalu AddNounmely;
Kácsfalu AddNounmely;
Kétújfalu:Kétújfalv AddNoun1mely;
Kézdiszászfalu AddNounmely;
Lendvahosszúfalu AddNounmely;
Lendvahosszúfalu:Lendvahosszúfalv AddNoun1mely;
Leányfalu AddNounmely;
Marosfelfalu AddNounmely;
Marosfelfalu:Marosfelfalv AddNoun1mely;
Nagytótfalu AddNounmely;
Nyergesújfalu AddNounmely;
Nyergesújfalu:Nyergesújfalv AddNoun1mely;
Németfalu AddNounmely;
Ontario-tó:Ontario-tav AddNoun1mely;
Orfalu AddNounmely;
Pátfalu AddNounmely;
Pázmándfalu:Pázmándfalv AddNoun1mely;
Rákócziújfalu AddNounmely;
Somoskőújfalu AddNounmely;
Sorkitótfalu:Sorkitótfalv AddNoun1mely;
Szigetújfalu AddNounmely;
Szécsényfelfalu AddNounmely;
Szépfalu:Szépfalv AddNoun1mely;
Tejfalu AddNounmely;
Tiszanagyfalu AddNounmely;
Tiszanagyfalu:Tiszanagyfalv AddNoun1mely;
Tófalu AddNounmely;
Uraiújfalu AddNounmely;
Uraiújfalu:Uraiújfalv AddNoun1mely;
Vámosújfalu AddNounmely;
Zichyújfalu:Zichyújfalv AddNoun1mely;
Zimándújfalu AddNounmely;
acélmag:acélmagv AddNoun1mely;
adatszó AddNounmely;
agyagfalu:agyagfalv AddNoun1mely;
alanymag:alanymagv AddNoun1mely;
alcímszó AddNounmely;
alpakagyapjú:alpakagyapj AddNoun1mely;
angyalszó AddNounmely;
apartmanfalu:apartmanfalv AddNoun1mely;
argószó AddNounmely;
asszonyfalu:asszonyfalv AddNoun1mely;
bakaszó:bakaszav AddNoun1mely;
bakterszó AddNounmely;
barlangodú:barlangodv AddNoun1mely;
becsszó AddNounmely;
belépőjelszó:belépőjelszav AddNoun1mely;
bemenőszó AddNounmely;
billenődaru:billenődarv AddNoun1mely;
birtokosszó AddNounmely;
bodzamag:bodzamagv AddNoun1mely;
bolygómag:bolygómagv AddNoun1mely;
bungalófalu AddNounmely;
bungalófalu:bungalófalv AddNoun1mely;
bátorságmag:bátorságmagv AddNoun1mely;
békaszó AddNounmely;
bóraxtó:bóraxtav AddNoun1mely;
bükkmag:bükkmagv AddNoun1mely;
bőgőszó AddNounmely;
cigájagyapjú:cigájagyapj AddNoun1mely;
ciántó:ciántav AddNoun1mely;
csaliszó AddNounmely;
csapatjelszó:csapatjelszav AddNoun1mely;
csatárfalu AddNounmely;
csempészfalu AddNounmely;
csempészfalu:csempészfalv AddNoun1mely;
csipkerózsamag:csipkerózsamagv AddNoun1mely;
csoportjelszó AddNounmely;
csónakdaru:csónakdarv AddNoun1mely;
csúfszó AddNounmely;
cölöpfalu AddNounmely;
datolyamag:datolyamagv AddNoun1mely;
deákszó AddNounmely;
diákszó AddNounmely;
dolgozómag:dolgozómagv AddNoun1mely;
duplaszó AddNounmely;
egérodú:egérodv AddNoun1mely;
egészszó AddNounmely;
elődfalu AddNounmely;
emlékszó:emlékszav AddNoun1mely;
erődfalu AddNounmely;
fantomszó AddNounmely;
fantáziaszó:fantáziaszav AddNoun1mely;
fazekasfalu AddNounmely;
fennszó AddNounmely;
fennszó:fennszav AddNoun1mely;
fiókjelszó AddNounmely;
fokozószó AddNounmely;
funkciószó:funkciószav AddNoun1mely;
félmozaikszó AddNounmely;
férfiszó:férfiszav AddNoun1mely;
főhó:főhav AddNoun1mely;
főszó AddNounmely;
gitárodú:gitárodv AddNoun1mely;
gyepvetőmag:gyepvetőmagv AddNoun1mely;
gyermekszó AddNounmely;
gyümölcsmag:gyümölcsmagv AddNoun1mely;
görögdinnyemag:görögdinnyemagv AddNoun1mely;
gúnyszó AddNounmely;
halászfalu:halászfalv AddNoun1mely;
harmóniumszó AddNounmely;
hatalomszó:hatalomszav AddNoun1mely;
határőrszó AddNounmely;
hiányszó AddNounmely;
hiányszó:hiányszav AddNoun1mely;
hátgyapjú:hátgyapj AddNoun1mely;
hívószó AddNounmely;
idegsejtmag:idegsejtmagv AddNoun1mely;
indulatszó AddNounmely;
információszó:információszav AddNoun1mely;
jelszó AddNounmely;
jelszómag:jelszómagv AddNoun1mely;
jószó AddNounmely;
kacsató:kacsatav AddNoun1mely;
kannibálfalu AddNounmely;
kapcsolószó:kapcsolószav AddNoun1mely;
kegyelemszó AddNounmely;
kemenceodú:kemenceodv AddNoun1mely;
keverékszó AddNounmely;
kezdőjelszó:kezdőjelszav AddNoun1mely;
kizárószó AddNounmely;
kohódaru:kohódarv AddNoun1mely;
koncfalu AddNounmely;
kormánymag:kormánymagv AddNoun1mely;
kultúrszó AddNounmely;
kultúrszó:kultúrszav AddNoun1mely;
kérdőszó:kérdőszav AddNoun1mely;
kísértetfalu AddNounmely;
könnytó:könnytav AddNoun1mely;
középfalu AddNounmely;
kőrismag:kőrismagv AddNoun1mely;
lexikoncímszó AddNounmely;
leánytó:leánytav AddNoun1mely;
láptó:láptav AddNoun1mely;
lövedékszó AddNounmely;
malacfalu:malacfalv AddNoun1mely;
medvefalu AddNounmely;
medvehagymamag:medvehagymamagv AddNoun1mely;
mesterségszó AddNounmely;
metántó:metántav AddNoun1mely;
mozsárszó:mozsárszav AddNoun1mely;
mukkszó AddNounmely;
médiafalu:médiafalv AddNoun1mely;
méhészszó AddNounmely;
műhelydaru:műhelydarv AddNoun1mely;
nagybőgőszó AddNounmely;
neuronsejtmag:neuronsejtmagv AddNoun1mely;
nyomorékfalu AddNounmely;
népdalszó:népdalszav AddNoun1mely;
orgonaszó:orgonaszav AddNoun1mely;
osztályozószó AddNounmely;
paprikamag:paprikamagv AddNoun1mely;
parasztszó AddNounmely;
patkányodú:patkányodv AddNoun1mely;
pipaszó AddNounmely;
pisztrángtó:pisztrángtav AddNoun1mely;
processzormag:processzormagv AddNoun1mely;
propagandajelszó AddNounmely;
pálmamag:pálmamagv AddNoun1mely;
páriaszó AddNounmely;
reformszó AddNounmely;
reformszó:reformszav AddNoun1mely;
repcevetőmag:repcevetőmagv AddNoun1mely;
rokoncímszó AddNounmely;
rémszó:rémszav AddNoun1mely;
révészfalu AddNounmely;
salakgyapjú:salakgyapj AddNoun1mely;
sikerfalu AddNounmely;
szakszó:szakszav AddNoun1mely;
szalagfalu AddNounmely;
szezámmag:szezámmagv AddNoun1mely;
szitokszó AddNounmely;
szotyolamag:szotyolamagv AddNoun1mely;
számítógépszó AddNounmely;
szólistamag:szólistamagv AddNoun1mely;
szörnyszó AddNounmely;
sárgabarackmag:sárgabarackmagv AddNoun1mely;
sörárpavetőmag:sörárpavetőmagv AddNoun1mely;
tabuszó AddNounmely;
teherdaru:teherdarv AddNoun1mely;
telepesfalu AddNounmely;
teveborjú:teveborj AddNoun1mely;
tirpákfalu AddNounmely;
transzformátorvasmag:transzformátorvasmagv AddNoun1mely;
turistafalu AddNounmely;
tárolótó:tárolótav AddNoun1mely;
töltőfalu AddNounmely;
töredékmag:töredékmagv AddNoun1mely;
tükörszó AddNounmely;
unalomfalu:unalomfalv AddNoun1mely;
valóságmag:valóságmagv AddNoun1mely;
varjúfalu AddNounmely;
vezérdaru:vezérdarv AddNoun1mely;
világfalu AddNounmely;
várostó:várostav AddNoun1mely;
vásárfalu AddNounmely;
zarándokfalu:zarándokfalv AddNoun1mely;
zengőszó AddNounmely;
zsákfalu AddNounmely;
zárványfalu:zárványfalv AddNoun1mely;
Újfalu AddNounmely;
álomtó:álomtav AddNoun1mely;
élőszó AddNounmely;
épületdaru:épületdarv AddNoun1mely;
öszvérszó:öszvérszav AddNoun1mely;
üdülőfalu AddNounmely;
őstó:őstav AddNoun1mely;
